New York, session 2025-2026, S8706.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The labor law is amended by adding a new section 201-j to 2 read as follows: 3 § 201-j. Artificial intelligence impact assessments. 1. Definition. 4 For purposes of this section, "covered business" shall mean a business 5 entity doing business in the state and: (a) employs more than fifty 6 people; or (b) is a publicly traded entity. 7 2. Reporting requirement. On or before March first of every year, a 8 covered business shall report to the department regarding the impact of 9 artificial intelligence on its hiring and the nature of its artificial 10 intelligence use in the calendar year ending the preceding December 11 thirty-first. Such report shall include: 12 (a) Employment data, including but not limited to: 13 (i) An estimate of the number of employees displaced, or whose hours 14 have been reduced, due in full or in part to use of artificial intelli- 15 gence; 16 (ii) An estimate of the number of employees hired, or whose hours have 17 been increased, due in full or in part to use of artificial intelli- 18 gence; and 19 (iii) An estimate of the number of positions previously filled that 20 the covered business has decided not to fill due in full or in part to 21 use of artificial intelligence; and 22 (b) Information on the nature of artificial intelligence usage, 23 including but not limited to: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14332-05-6 S. 8706--B 2 1 (i) Descriptions of the objectives of the use of artificial intelli- 2 gence; 3 (ii) Information regarding any human oversight of artificial intelli- 4 gence; 5 (iii) Information on the frequency and length of use of artificial 6 intelligence; 7 (iv) Information on any use of artificial intelligence in relation to 8 sensitive personal data, including storage and access protections 9 related to use of artificial intelligence in relation to such personal 10 data; and 11 (v) Measures in place for oversight, risk reduction, or other 12 protections related to use of artificial intelligence. 13 3. Responsibilities of the department. The department shall develop 14 standard reporting forms and processes for covered businesses to submit 15 the reports required pursuant to subdivision two of this section. The 16 department may develop additional reporting requirements related to the 17 hiring and business impacts of utilization of artificial intelligence by 18 covered businesses. 19 4. Annual report. (a) The department shall review the reports submit- 20 ted by covered businesses pursuant to subdivision two of this section 21 and shall prepare an annual report on the impact of artificial intelli- 22 gence on hiring and the nature of artificial intelligence usage in the 23 state based on the department's review of such reports submitted pursu- 24 ant to subdivision two of this section. 25 (b) The department shall submit the report required pursuant to para- 26 graph (a) of this subdivision to the governor, the temporary president 27 of the senate, the minority leader of the senate, the speaker of the 28 assembly, and the minority leader of the assembly within one hundred 29 twenty days of the covered business reporting deadline established 30 pursuant to subdivision two of this section. Such report shall be made 31 publicly available on the department's website at the same time as such 32 report is submitted to the governor and legislature. 33 (c) The report required pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subdivision 34 shall include, but not be limited to, presentation of aggregate data 35 regarding employment impacts, objectives, and implementation of artifi- 36 cial intelligence by covered businesses, including analysis of such 37 impacts by employment sector, geographic location, and business size. 38 5. Enforcement. (a) A covered business who fails to report pursuant to 39 the requirements of this section shall be subject to a civil penalty of 40 not more than five hundred dollars for each day such covered business 41 remains in violation of such reporting requirements. 42 (b) Upon notice of a violation of this section, a covered business 43 shall have ninety days to resolve such violation to the satisfaction of 44 the commissioner. If the commissioner is satisfied that the violation 45 has been cured within the ninety-day period, the commissioner shall 46 waive or reduce the applicable penalties under this subdivision. 47 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.